Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.090

Establishment of funds.

The director shall establish such fund or funds, separate from existing funds, necessary to administer this chapter, and payment to these funds shall be from legislative appropriation, statutory provision, reimbursement and subrogation as provided in this chapter, and from any contributions or grants specifically so directed.

[ 1995 c 234 s 3; 1973 1st ex.s. c 122 s 9.]

NOTES:

Finding—1995 c 234: See note following RCW 72.09.095.